Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-204.02
Postnatal care, defined.

Postnatal care means an office visit to an advanced practice registered nurse occurring after birth, with reference to the infant or mother.

Laws 2022, LB905, § 4.